District of Columbia statutes.
4-402.01

Funding for day care provided by D.C. Public Schools.

(a)

In Fiscal Year 2004, the Department may transfer no more than $6 million to the D.C. Public Schools for the purpose of funding an after-school day care program pursuant to a memorandum of understanding. The memorandum of understanding shall include the following program requirements:

(1)

Participation in the program shall be based on TANF eligibility;

(2)

Verification of family income shall be required before a child may be enrolled in the program;

(3)

Priority shall be given to children of families actively participating in TANF;

(4)

Additional slots shall be allocated on the sliding scale set forth in § 4-405(b); and

(5)

Records documenting the costs of the program shall be maintained and provided to the Department on an annual basis, including:

(A)

Verifiable data establishing the number of children enrolled by the program;

(B)

Documentation that each enrolled child met the eligibility requirements for the program; and

(C)

Reports documenting, for each month of operation, the funds expended in relation to service delivery.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 3a
as added Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 2702, 50 DCR 5668
Short title of title XXVII of Law 15-39: Section 2701 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XXVII of the act may be cited as the Day Care in Schools Eligibility Requirement Amendment Act of 2003.